Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,184
Dissolution by incorporators or
initial directors.

(MBCA
14.01) A majority of the incorporators or initial directors of a corporation
that has not issued shares or has not commenced business may dissolve the
corporation by delivering to the Secretary of State for filing articles of
dissolution that set forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The date of its incorporation;

(3) Either (i) that none
of the corporation's shares has been issued or (ii) that the corporation has
not commenced business;

(4)
That no debt of the corporation remains unpaid;

(5) That the net assets of the corporation
remaining after winding up have been distributed to the shareholders, if shares
were issued; and

(6)
That a majority of the incorporators or initial directors authorized the dissolution.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 184.
January 1, 2016